Utah statutes.
75-6-106.   Accounts and transfers nontestamentary.

Any transfers resulting from the application of Section 75-6-104 are effective by reason of the account contracts involved and this statute and are not to be considered as testamentary or subject to Chapters 1 through 4 of this code, except as provided in Sections 75-2-201 through 75-2-214, and except as a consequence of, and to the extent directed by, Sections 75-6-107 and 75-3-916.



Amended by Chapter 39, 1998 General Session

